District of Columbia statutes.
3-304

Motor vehicle parking areas.

Upon the request of the Armory Board the Secretary of the Interior shall provide for the use of said Board, under such arrangements for improvement, lighting, and maintenance as may be agreed upon between the Secretary of the Interior and said Board, such areas of land adjacent to the Armory and under the control of the Secretary of the Interior as said Board deems adequate for motor vehicle parking purposes.

June 4, 1948, 62 Stat. 339, ch. 418, § 4
1981 Ed., § 2-304.
1973 Ed., § 2-1704.